Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2109.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 307. Prohibiting occupancy limits.(a) Prohibition.--A local government unit may not limit the number of individuals who may live together in a single dwelling based on familial relationship but may limit the number of individuals who may live together in a single dwelling basedon demonstrated health and safety standards, including any applicable building or construction codes and standards promulgated by regulation under the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code <--<--12345678910111213141516 Act, fire code regulations or Department of Environmental Protection wastewater and water quality standards.§ 307. OCCUPANCY LIMITS.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B), A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY LIMIT OCCUPANCY TO FIVE INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE NOT RELATED THROUGH BLOOD, MARRIAGE, ADOPTION OR FOSTER CARE AND WHO LIVE TOGETHER IN A SINGLE DWELLING BASED ON:(1) DEMONSTRATED HEALTH AND SAFETY STANDARDS, INCLUDING ANY APPLICABLE BUILDING OR CONSTRUCTION CODE OR STANDARDS PROMULGATED BY REGULATION UNDER THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1999 (P.L.491, NO.45), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSTRUCTION CODE ACT, FIRE CODE REGULATIONS OR WASTEWATER AND WATER QUALITY STANDARDS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION; OR(2) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUALS ARE MATRICULATED STUDENTS AT A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY.(B) PROHIBITION.--A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT LIMIT THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS WHO LIVE TOGETHER IN A SINGLE DWELLING BASED ON THEIR FAMILIAL RELATIONSHIP.(C) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT THE AUTHORITY, UNDER OTHER LAW, OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO LIMIT OCCUPANCY OF A FACILITY LICENSED BY THE COMMONWEALTH.(b) (D) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Familial relationship." An individual's connection to one or more other individuals through blood, marriage, adoption or foster care."Local government unit." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional 20250HB2109PN3488 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plan municipality or optional charter municipality in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2109PN3488 - 3 - 123